Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB412.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 311.601 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may promulgate[adopt] reasonable administrative[rules and] regulations
to effectuate and implement[ the provisions of] KRS 311.550 to 311.620, including
but not limited to administrative regulations designed to ensure the continuing
professional competency of present and future licensees. As an adjunct to the power
conferred upon the board by this section, the board may require licensees to submit
to interrogation as to the nature and extent of their postgraduate medical education
and to require licensees found to be deficient in their efforts to keep abreast of new
methods and technology, to obtain additional instruction and training therein.
(2) As part of the continuing medical education which the board adopts to ensure
continuing professional competency of present and future licensees, the board shall
ensure that:
(a) Current practicing pediatricians, including those certified in medicine and
pediatrics, radiologists, family practitioners, and those physicians practicing
in an emergency medicine or urgent care setting, demonstrate completion of a
one (1) time course of at least one (1) hour of continuing medical education
approved by the board and covering the recognition and prevention of
pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020, prior to December
31, 2017;[ and]
(b) Future practicing pediatricians, including those certified in medicine and
pediatrics, radiologists, family practitioners, and those physicians who will
practice in an emergency medicine or urgent care setting, demonstrate
completion of a one (1) time course of at least one (1) hour of continuing
medical education, or its equivalent, approved by the board and covering the
recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/15/2026 9:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1740
KRS 620.020, within five (5) years of licensure. Future practicing
pediatricians, including those certified in medicine and pediatrics,
radiologists, family practitioners, and those physicians who will practice in an
emergency medicine or urgent care setting may apply pediatric abusive head
trauma curriculum taught in their medical school education to count towards
the required one (1) hour of continuing medical education; and
(c) Current practicing physicians demonstrate completion of at least three (3)
hours of continuing medical education every three (3) years that is approved
by the board and covers the recognition and treatment of mental health
issues, including but not limited to emotional, psychological, and social
well-being issues and mental health disorders.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/15/2026 9:16 AM Jacketed